New York, session 2025-2026, S6589.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The economic development law is amended by adding a new 2 section 139-a to read as follows: 3 § 139-a. Save our small-business grant program. 1. For the purposes 4 of this section, the "save our small-business grant program" shall mean 5 the program established pursuant to subdivision two of this section. 6 2. The division for small-business, in conjunction with the state's 7 regional economic development councils, shall develop and implement a 8 save our small-business grant program to aid small-businesses in this 9 state impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic, in accordance with the 10 provisions of this section. 11 3. The state's regional economic development councils shall provide 12 the funds necessary to operate the save our small-business grant program 13 in accordance with the provisions of this section. 14 4. The division for small-business, in conjunction with the state's 15 regional economic development councils, shall develop an application 16 process whereby small-businesses located in this state may submit an 17 application for a grant to the save our small-business grant program. 18 The save our small-business grant program shall process and approve such 19 applications in a manner to be determined by the division for small-bu- 20 siness in conjunction with the state's regional economic development 21 councils. Such application process shall be published conspicuously on 22 the regional economic development councils' website. For a small-busi- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03379-01-5 S. 6589 2 1 ness to be eligible for such approval, such small-business shall demon- 2 strate on its application that it has suffered a qualifying hardship as 3 a result of the COVID-19 pandemic. 4 5. The division for small-businesses, in conjunction with the state's 5 regional economic development councils, shall develop a list of qualify- 6 ing hardships that shall satisfy the requirement under subdivision four 7 of this section. Such list of qualifying hardships shall be published 8 conspicuously on the regional economic development councils' website. 9 6. The save our small-business grant program shall not award a grant 10 of greater than fifty thousand dollars to any single small business. 11 7. The director of the budget shall notify the division for small-bu- 12 siness and the state's regional economic development councils upon the 13 return of New York state's economic relief to pre-COVID-19-pandemic 14 levels, when upon such notification the save our small-business grant 15 program shall not accept any new applications and shall finalize the 16 fulfilment of any pending grants. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 18 have become a law, and shall expire upon the notification by the direc- 19 tor of the budget provided for in subdivision 7 of section 139-a of the 20 economic development law, as added by section one of this act; provided 21 that the director of the budget shall notify the legislative bill draft- 22 ing commission upon the occurrence of such notification in order that 23 the commission may maintain an accurate and timely effective data base 24 of the official text of the laws of the state of New York in furtherance 25 of effectuating the provisions of section 44 of the legislative law and 26 section 70-b of the public officers law.